Vermont, session 2025-2026, H626.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 13 V.S.A. § 2605 is amended to read:
§ 2605. VOYEURISM
(a) Definitions. As used in this section:
(1) “Bona fide private investigator or bona fide security guard” means
an individual lawfully providing services, whether licensed or unlicensed,
pursuant to 26 V.S.A. §§ 3151 and 3151a.
(2) “Female breast” means any portion of the female breast below the
top of the areola.
(3) “Circumstances in which a person has a reasonable expectation of
privacy” means circumstances in which a reasonable person would believe that
his or her the person’s intimate areas would not be visible to the public,
regardless of whether that person is in a public or private area. This definition
includes circumstances in which a person knowingly disrobes in front of
another, but does not expect nor give consent for the other person to
photograph, film, or record his or her the person’s intimate areas.
(4) “Intimate areas” means the naked or undergarment-clad genitals,
pubic area, buttocks, or female breast of a person.
(5) “Place where a person has a reasonable expectation of privacy”
means:
VT LEG #389272 v.1

No. 89 Page 2 of 14
2026
(A) a place in which a reasonable person would believe that he or she
the person could disrobe in privacy, without his or her the person undressing
being viewed by another; or
(B) a place in which a reasonable person would expect to be safe
from unwanted intrusion or surveillance.
(6) “Sexual conduct” shall have has the same meaning as in section
2821 of this title.
(7) “Surveillance” means secret observation of the activities of another
person for the purpose of spying upon and invading the privacy of the person.
(8) “View” means the intentional looking upon another person for more
than a brief period of time, in other than a casual or cursory manner, with the
unaided eye or a device designed or intended to improve visual acuity.
(9) “Harm” means physical injury, financial injury, or serious emotional
distress.
(b) Unlawful viewing. No person shall intentionally view, photograph,
film, or record in any format:
(1) the intimate areas of another person without that person’s knowledge
and consent while the person being viewed, photographed, filmed, or recorded
is in a place where he or she the person would have a reasonable expectation of
privacy or under circumstances in which the person has a reasonable
expectation of privacy; or
VT LEG #389272 v.1

No. 89 Page 3 of 14
2026
(2) the intimate areas of another person without that person’s knowledge
and consent and under circumstances in which the person has a reasonable
expectation of privacy a person engaged in sexual conduct without that
person’s knowledge and consent while the person being viewed is in a place
where the person would have a reasonable expectation of privacy or under
circumstances in which the person has a reasonable expectation of privacy.
(c) Unlawful photographing, filming, or recording. No person shall display
or disclose to a third party any image recorded in violation of subsection (b),
(d), or (e) of this section intentionally photograph, film, or record in any
format:
(1) the intimate areas of another person without that person’s knowledge
and consent while the person being photographed, filmed, or recorded is in a
place where the person would have a reasonable expectation of privacy or
under circumstances in which the person has a reasonable expectation of
privacy; or
(2) a person engaged in sexual conduct without that person’s knowledge
and consent while the person being photographed, filmed, or recorded is in a
place where the person would have a reasonable expectation of privacy or
under circumstances in which the person has a reasonable expectation of
privacy.
(d) Surveillance. No person shall intentionally conduct surveillance or
intentionally photograph, film, or record in any format a person without that
VT LEG #389272 v.1

No. 89 Page 4 of 14
2026
person’s knowledge and consent while the person being surveilled,
photographed, filmed, or recorded is in a place where he or she the person
would have a reasonable expectation of privacy within a home or residence.
Bona fide private investigators and bona fide security guards engaged in
otherwise lawful activities within the scope of their employment are exempt
from this subsection.
(e) Display or disclosure to a third party. No person shall intentionally
photograph, film, or record in any format a person without that person’s
knowledge and consent while that person is in a place where a person has a
reasonable expectation of privacy and that person is engaged in sexual conduct
display or disclose to a third party an image recorded in violation of subsection
(c) of this section.
(f) Applicability. This section shall apply to a person who intentionally
views, photographs, films, or records the intimate areas of a person as part of a
security or theft prevention policy or program at a place of business.
(g) Exceptions. This section shall not apply to:
(1) a law enforcement officer conducting official law enforcement
activities in accordance with State and federal law; or
(2) official activities of the Department of Corrections, a law
enforcement agency, the Agency of Human Services, or a court for security
purposes or during the investigation of alleged misconduct by a person in the
VT LEG #389272 v.1

No. 89 Page 5 of 14
2026
custody of the Department of Corrections, a law enforcement agency, the
Agency of Human Services, or a court.
(h) Constitutionally protected activity. This section is not intended to
infringe upon the freedom of the press to gather and disseminate news as
guaranteed by the First Amendment to the Constitution of the United States.
(i) Affirmative defense. It shall be an affirmative defense to a violation of
subsection (b) or (c) of this section that the defendant was a bona fide private
investigator or bona fide security guard conducting surveillance in the ordinary
course of business, and the violation was unintentional and incidental to
otherwise legal surveillance. However, an unintentional and incidental
violation of subsection (b) or (c) of this section shall not be a defense to a
violation of subsection (c)(e) of this section.
(j) Penalties.
(1) For a first offense involving a victim who is 18 years of age or older,
a person who violates subsection (b), (c), or (d), or (e) of this section shall be
imprisoned not more than two years or fined not more than $1,000.00, or both.
For a second or subsequent offense involving a victim who is 18 years of age
or older, a person who violates subsection (b), (c), or (d), or (e) of this section
shall be imprisoned not more than three years or fined not more than
$5,000.00, or both.
(2) For a first offense involving a victim who is under 18 years of age, a
person who violates subsection (b), (c), or (d) of this section shall be
VT LEG #389272 v.1

No. 89 Page 6 of 14
2026
imprisoned not more than three years or fined not more than $5,000.00, or
both. For a second or subsequent offense involving a victim who is under 18
years of age, a person who violates subsection (b), (c), or (d) of this section
shall be imprisoned not more than five years or fined not more than
$10,000.00, or both.
(3) A person who violates subsection (c)(e) of this section shall be
imprisoned not more than five years or fined not more than $5,000.00, or both.
(k) Civil.
(1) A plaintiff shall have a private cause of action against a defendant
who intentionally displays or discloses to a third party an image recorded in
violation of subsection (c) of this section and the display or disclosure causes
the plaintiff harm.
(2) In addition to any other relief available at law, the court may order
equitable relief, including a temporary restraining order, a preliminary
injunction, or a permanent injunction ordering the defendant to cease display
or disclosure of the image. The court may grant injunctive relief maintaining
the confidentiality of a plaintiff using a pseudonym.
(3) In an action brought pursuant to this subsection, the required element
in a negligence claim of actual injury to the plaintiff may be satisfied by a
diagnosis of a disorder resulting from trauma.
(4) A civil action authorized by this subsection may be commenced at
any time after the act alleged to have caused the injury or condition.
VT LEG #389272 v.1

No. 89 Page 7 of 14
2026
Notwithstanding 1 V.S.A. § 214, this subsection shall apply retroactively to a
violation of this section that occurred on or after July 1, 2005, irrespective of
any statute of limitations in effect at the time the violation occurred.
Sec. 2. 13 V.S.A. § 2606 is amended to read:
§ 2606. DISCLOSURE OF SEXUALLY EXPLICIT IMAGES WITHOUT
CONSENT
(a) As used in this section:
(1) “Disclose” includes transfer, publish, distribute, exhibit, or
reproduce.
(2) “Harm” means physical injury, financial injury, or serious emotional
distress.
(3) “Nude” means any one or more of the following uncovered parts of
the human body:
(A) genitals;
(B) pubic area;
(C) anus; or
(D) post-pubescent female nipple.
(4) “Sexual conduct” shall have has the same meaning as in section
2821 of this title.
(5) “Visual image” includes a photograph, film, videotape, recording, or
digital reproduction, including an image created or altered by digitization.
VT LEG #389272 v.1

No. 89 Page 8 of 14
2026
(6) “Digitization” means the process of altering an image in a realistic
manner utilizing an image or images of a person, including images other than
the person depicted, or computer-generated images.
(b)(1) A No person violates this section if the person shall knowingly
discloses disclose a visual image of an identifiable person who is nude or who
is engaged in sexual conduct, without the person’s consent, with the intent to
harm, harass, or intimidate, threaten, or coerce the person depicted, and the
disclosure would cause a reasonable person to suffer harm. A person may be
identifiable from the image itself or information offered in connection with the
image. Consent to recording or production of the visual image does not, by
itself, constitute consent for disclosure of the image. A person who violates
this subdivision (1) shall be imprisoned not more than two years or fined not
more than $2,000.00, or both.
(2) A person who violates this subdivision (1) of this subsection with the
intent of disclosing the image for financial profit shall be imprisoned not more
than five years or fined not more than $10,000.00, or both.
(2) For purposes of this section, a person may be identifiable from the
image itself or information offered in connection with the image. Consent to
recording or production of the visual image does not, by itself, constitute
consent for disclosure of the image.
(c) A person who maintains an internet website, online service, online
application, or mobile application that contains a visual image of an
VT LEG #389272 v.1

No. 89 Page 9 of 14
2026
identifiable person who is nude or who is engaged in sexual conduct shall not
solicit or accept a fee or other consideration to remove, delete, correct, modify,
or refrain from posting or disclosing the visual image if requested by the
depicted person.
(d) This section shall not apply to:
(1) Images involving voluntary nudity or sexual conduct in public or
commercial settings or in a place where a person does not have a reasonable
expectation of privacy.
(2) Disclosures made in the public interest, including the reporting of
unlawful conduct, or lawful and common practices of law enforcement,
criminal reporting, corrections, legal proceedings, or medical treatment.
(3) Disclosures of materials that constitute a matter of public concern.
(4) Interactive computer services, as defined in 47 U.S.C. § 230(f)(2), or
information services or telecommunications services, as defined in 47 U.S.C.
§ 153, for content solely provided by another person. This subdivision shall
not preclude other remedies available at law.
(e)(1) A plaintiff shall have a private cause of action against a defendant
who knowingly discloses, without the plaintiff’s consent, an identifiable visual
image of the plaintiff while the plaintiff is nude or engaged in sexual conduct
and the disclosure causes the plaintiff harm.
(2) In addition to any other relief available at law, the court may order
equitable relief, including a temporary restraining order, a preliminary
VT LEG #389272 v.1

No. 89 Page 10 of 14
2026
injunction, or a permanent injunction ordering the defendant to cease display
or disclosure of the image. The court may grant injunctive relief maintaining
the confidentiality of a plaintiff using a pseudonym.
(3) In an action brought pursuant to this subsection, the required element
in a negligence claim of actual injury to the plaintiff may be satisfied by a
diagnosis of a disorder resulting from trauma.
(4) A civil action authorized by this subsection may be commenced at
any time after the act alleged to have caused the injury or condition.
Notwithstanding 1 V.S.A. § 214, this subsection shall apply retroactively to a
violation of this section that occurred on or after July 1, 2015, irrespective of
any statute of limitations in effect at the time the violation occurred.
Sec. 3. 13 V.S.A. § 2607 is added to read:
§ 2607. SEXUAL EXTORTION
(a) As used in this section:
(1) “Nude” has the same meaning as in section 2606 of this title.
(2) “Serious bodily injury” has the same meaning as in section 1021 of
this title.
(3) “Sexual conduct” has the same meaning as in section 2821 of this
title.
(4) “Visual image” has the same meaning as is section 2606 of this title.
VT LEG #389272 v.1

No. 89 Page 11 of 14
2026
(b) No person shall knowingly threaten to disclose a visual image of an
identifiable person who is nude or who is engaged in sexual conduct, without
the person’s consent, with the intent to compel a person to:
(1) produce nude images or images of sexual conduct;
(2) engage in sexual conduct;
(3) engage in any act against the person’s will;
(4) refrain from engaging in any act in which the person has a legal right
to engage; or
(5) provide money or anything of value.
(c) With the intent to compel a person to produce nude visual images or
visual images of sexual conduct or to engage in sexual conduct, no person shall
knowingly threaten to:
(1) accuse a person of a crime or cause criminal charges to be instituted
against a person;
(2) cause injury to a person or property;
(3) expose or publicize an asserted fact, whether true or false, intending
to subject another person to hatred, contempt, or ridicule; or
(4) report a person’s immigration status or suspected immigration status.
(d)(1) A person who violates this section shall be imprisoned not more than
three years or fined not more than $3,000.00, or both, if the victim of the
offense is 18 years of age or older.
VT LEG #389272 v.1

No. 89 Page 12 of 14
2026
(2) A person who violates this section shall be imprisoned not more than
10 years or fined not more than $10,000.00, or both, if the victim of the offense
is under 18 years of age.
(3) If serious bodily injury or death results from a violation of this
section, the person convicted of the violation shall be imprisoned not more
than 15 years or fined not more $15,000.00, or both.
(e) A person who, in good faith and in a timely manner, reports to law
enforcement that the person is a victim of a violation of this section shall not
be cited, arrested, or prosecuted for a violation of section 2802 (disseminating
indecent material to a minor in the presence of the minor), 2802a
(disseminating indecent material to a minor outside the presence of the minor),
or 2802b (minor electronically disseminating indecent material to another
person) of this title.
(f) The immunity provisions of this section apply only to the use and
derivative use of evidence gained as a proximate result of the person reporting
to law enforcement that the person is a victim of a violation of this section and
do not preclude prosecution of the person on the basis of evidence obtained
from an independent source.
Sec. 4. 13 V.S.A. § 4501 is amended to read:
§ 4501. LIMITATION OF PROSECUTIONS FOR CERTAIN CRIMES
(a) Prosecutions for aggravated sexual assault, aggravated sexual assault of
a child, sexual assault, sexual exploitation of a minor as defined in subsection
VT LEG #389272 v.1

No. 89 Page 13 of 14
2026
3258(c) of this title, human trafficking, aggravated human trafficking, murder,
manslaughter, arson causing death, and kidnapping may be commenced at any
time after the commission of the offense.
(b) Prosecutions for lewd and lascivious conduct, sexual abuse of a
vulnerable adult under subsection 1379(a) of this title, grand larceny, robbery,
burglary, embezzlement, forgery, bribery offenses, false claims, fraud under
33 V.S.A. § 141(d), and felony tax offenses shall be commenced within six
years after the commission of the offense, and not after.
(c) Prosecutions for any of the following offenses shall be commenced
within 40 years after the commission of the offense, and not after:
(1) lewd and lascivious conduct under section 2601 of this title alleged
to have been committed against a child under 18 years of age;
(2) maiming under section 2701 of this title;
(3) lewd or lascivious conduct with a child under section 2602 of this
title;
(4) sexual exploitation of children under chapter 64 of this title; and
(5) sexual abuse of a vulnerable adult under subsection 1379(b) of this
title;
(6) voyeurism involving photographing, filming, or recording under
subsection 2605(c) of this title;
(7) voyeurism involving display or disclosure of images to a third party
under subsection 2605(e) of this title;
VT LEG #389272 v.1

No. 89 Page 14 of 14
2026
(8) disclosure of sexually explicit images without consent under section
2606 of this title; and
(9) sexual extortion under section 2607 of this title.
(d) Prosecutions for arson and first degree aggravated domestic assault
shall be commenced within 11 years after the commission of the offense, and
not after.
(e) Prosecutions for other felonies and for misdemeanors shall be
commenced within three years after the commission of the offense, and not
after.
Sec. 5. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
Date Governor signed bill: April 28, 2026
VT LEG #389272 v.1